Hawaii statutes.
[§431C-52] Conflict of laws. (a) If
there is more than one owner of a single policy, and the owners are residents
of different states, the life settlement contract shall be governed by the law
of the state in which the owner having the largest percentage ownership resides
or, if the owners hold equal ownership, the state of residence of one owner
agreed upon in writing by all of the owners. The law of the state of the
insured shall govern in the event that equal owners fail to agree in writing
upon a state of residence for jurisdictional purposes.

(b) A provider from this State who enters into
a life settlement contract with an owner who is a resident of another state
that has enacted statutes or adopted regulations governing life settlement
contracts, shall be governed in the effectuation of that life settlement
contract by the statutes and regulations of the owner's state of residence. If
the state in which the owner is a resident has not enacted statutes or
regulations governing life settlement contracts, the provider shall give the
owner notice that neither that state nor this State regulates the transaction
upon which the owner is entering. For transactions in those states, however,
the provider shall maintain all records required if the transactions were
executed in the state of residence. The forms used in those states need not be
approved by the insurance division.

(c) If there is a conflict in the laws that
apply to an owner and a purchaser in any individual transaction, the laws of
the state that apply to the owner shall take precedence and the provider shall
comply with those laws. [L 2012, c 256, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next